Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-1008
Limitation of actions.

Any statute of limitations applicable to an action asserting a claim for relief under a premarital agreement is tolled during the marriage of the parties to the agreement. However, equitable defenses limiting the time for enforcement, including laches and estoppel, are available to either party.

Laws 1994, LB 202, § 8.